zh-CN: 制动卡钳随附硬件: 卡钳 + 支架; 卡钳 + 支架 + 硬件; 卡钳 + 硬件（无支架）; 仅卡钳; 其他
bg-BG: Включени крепежни елементи за спирачния апарат: Апарат + супорт; Апарат + супорт + крепежни елементи; Апарат + крепежни елементи (без супорт); Само спирачен апарат; Други
el: Περιλαμβάνεται υλικός εξοπλισμός δαγκάνας φρένου: Δαγκάνα + βάση; Δαγκάνα + βάση + υλικός εξοπλισμός; Δαγκάνα + υλικός εξοπλισμός (χωρίς βάση); Μόνο δαγκάνα; Άλλο
th: อุปกรณ์ที่มาพร้อมกับก้ามปูเบรก: คาลิปเปอร์ + ขาจับ; คาลิปเปอร์ + ขาจับ + ฮาร์ดแวร์; คาลิปเปอร์ + ฮาร์ดแวร์ (ไม่มีขาจับ); คาลิปเปอร์เท่านั้น; อื่นๆ
de: Enthaltene Komponenten für Bremssattel: Bremssattel + Halter; Bremssattel + Halter + Zubehör; Bremssattel + Zubehör (ohne Halter); Nur Bremssattel; Sonstige
ru: Комплектация тормозного суппорта: Суппорт и скоба; Суппорт, скоба и крепеж; Суппорт и крепеж (без скобы); Только суппорт; Другое
it: Pinza freno hardwareinclusa: Pinza e staffa; Pinza, staffa e minuteria; Pinza e minuteria (senza staffa); Solo pinza; Altro
sl-SI: Priložene komponente zavorne čeljusti: Čeljust in nosilec; Čeljust, nosilec in okovje; Čeljust in okovje (brez nosilca); Samo čeljust; Drugo
en: Brake caliper included hardware: Caliper + bracket; Caliper + bracket + hardware; Caliper + hardware (no bracket); Caliper only; Other
nb: Bremsekaliper inkludert maskinvare: Kaliper + brakett; Kaliper + brakett + monteringsdeler; Kaliper + monteringsdeler (uten brakett); Kun kaliper; Annet
sv: Bromsoksutrustning som ingår: Bromsok + fäste; Bromsok + fäste + monteringsdetaljer; Bromsok + monteringsdetaljer (inget fäste); Endast bromsok; Övrigt
nl: Remklauw meegeleverde onderdelen: Remklauw + houder; Remklauw + houder + bevestigingsmateriaal; Remklauw + bevestigingsmateriaal (geen houder); Alleen remklauw; Overig
ja: ブレーキキャリパーに含まれるハードウェア: キャリパーとブラケット; キャリパー、ブラケット、金具; キャリパーと金具 (ブラケットなし); キャリパーのみ; その他
cs: Montážní příslušenství brzdového třmenu přiložené v balení: Třmen + držák; Třmen + držák + hardware; Třmen + hardware (bez držáku); Pouze třmen; Jiné
da: Dele, der følger med bremsekaliperen: Bremsekaliber og -beslag; Bremsekaliber, beslag og hardware; Bremsekaliber og hardware (uden beslag); Kun bremsekaliber; Andet
pl: Elementy montażowe zacisku hamulcowego w zestawie: Zacisk + jarzmo; Zacisk + jarzmo + osprzęt; Zacisk + osprzęt (bez jarzma); Tylko zacisk; Inne
zh-TW: 煞車卡鉗包含五金配件: 卡鉗 + 支架; 卡鉗 + 支架 + 硬體; 卡鉗 + 硬體 (無支架); 僅含卡鉗; 其他
ko: 브레이크 캘리퍼 포함 하드웨어: 캘리퍼 + 브래킷; 캘리퍼 + 브래킷 + 하드웨어; 캘리퍼 + 하드웨어(브래킷 없음); 캘리퍼만; 기타
pt-PT: Acessórios incluídos na pinça de travão: Pinça + suporte; Pinça + suporte + acessórios de montagem; Pinça + material de montagem (sem suporte); Apenas pinça; Outro
hr-HR: Kočiona čeljust uključena u hardver: Čeljust i nosač; Čeljust, nosač i oprema; Čeljust i oprema (bez nosača); Samo čeljust; Ostalo
sk-SK: Hardvér vo výbave brzdového strmeňa: Strmeň + držiak; Strmeň + držiak + hardvér; Strmeň + hardvér (bez držiaka); Len strmeň; Iný
hu: Féknyereghez biztosított tartozék: Féknyereg + tartókonzol; Féknyereg + tartókonzol + szerelékek; Féknyereg + szerelékek (konzol nélkül); Csak féknyereg; Egyéb
tr: Fren kaliperi dahil donanım: Kaliper + braket; Kaliper + braket + donanım; Kaliper + donanım (braket yok); Yalnızca kaliper; Diğer
vi: Trang thiết bị đi kèm kẹp phanh: Ngàm phanh + giá đỡ; Ngàm phanh + giá đỡ + phần cứng; Ngàm phanh + phần cứng (không có giá đỡ); Chỉ ngàm phanh; Khác
fi: Jarrusatula sisällytettynä laitteena: Jarrusatula ja kannake; Jarrusatula, kannake ja asennustarvikkeet; Jarrusatula ja asennustarvikkeet (ei kannaketta); Vain jarrusatula; Muu
ro-RO: Componente hardware incluse în etrierul de frână: Etrier + suport; Etrier + suport + accesorii de montaj; Etrier + accesorii de montaj (fără suport); Doar etrier; Altele
lt-LT: Įtraukta stabdžių suporto techninė įranga: Apkaba + laikiklis; Apkaba + laikiklis + techninė įranga; Apkaba + techninė įranga (be laikiklio); Tik apkaba; Kita
es: Herrajes incluidos de la pinza de freno: Pinza y soporte; Pinza, soporte y hardware; Pinza y hardware (sin soporte); Solo pinza; Otro
pt-BR: Equipamentos incluídos com a pinça de freio: Pinça + suporte; Pinça + suporte + ferragens; Pinça + ferragens (sem suporte); Apenas pinça; Outro
fr: Matériel de montage inclus avec l’étrier de frein: Étrier + support; Étrier + support + matériel; Étrier + matériel (sans support); Étrier uniquement; Autre